Nebraska, session 109, LB639.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB639 LB639
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Dental care provider means a dentist who bills for dental care
services in Nebraska;
(b) Dental care services means services for the diagnosis,
prevention, treatment, or cure of a dental condition, illness, injury, or
disease. Dental care services does not include services delivered by a
dental care provider that are billed as medical services under a health
insurance plan;
(c) Dental loss ratio means the ratio of incurred claims to earned
premiums as calculated using the formula provided in subdivision (2)(b)
of this section;
(d) Dental plan carrier means an entity subject to the insurance
laws, rules, and regulations of this state or subject to the jurisdiction
of the director that contracts, or offers to contract, to provide,
deliver, arrange for, pay for, or reimburse any of the costs of dental
care services, including a dental insurance company, a prepaid limited
health service organization, or any other entity authorized to offer an
insurance plan that provides dental care services;
(e) Department means the Department of Insurance;
(f) Director means the Director of Insurance;
(g) Earned premiums means the portion of the premium paid in the
reporting year that is intended to provide coverage during that reporting
period; and
(h) Incurred claims means the claims for which services were
provided in that reporting year. Incurred claims include claims that were
paid in the reporting year and unpaid claims reserves for claims paid
after the reporting year.
(2)(a) Beginning January 1, 2026, a dental plan carrier shall meet a
minimum dental loss ratio requirement of eighty-five percent.
(b) Minimum dental loss ratios are calculated by dividing the
incurred claims for the dental loss ratio reporting year by the earned
-2-

LB639 LB639
2025 2025
premiums for the dental loss ratio reporting year less any taxes and
licensing and regulatory fees for such year.
(3)(a) Beginning January 1, 2027, a dental plan carrier shall
annually submit to the department the dental loss ratio for the previous
calendar year calculated in accordance with subdivision (2)(b) of this
section. The annual filing shall, at a minimum, include rates, rating
schedules, and supporting documentation, including the ratio of incurred
claims to earned premiums for each calendar year since the plan's
issuance. The required information shall be in a form and manner
prescribed by the department and shall demonstrate that each plan
complies with the minimum dental loss ratio standards.
(b) If the minimum dental loss ratio required by subdivision (2)(a)
of this section is not met, the dental plan carrier shall return the
excess premiums to its insureds.
(4) This section does not apply to an insurance policy issued, sold,
renewed, or offered for dental care services or coverages provided
pursuant to the medical assistance program established pursuant to the
Medical Assistance Act.
(5) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out this section.
-3-